California statutes. Public Resources Code
If the local government does not amend its local coastal program, such person may file with the commission a request for amendment which shall set forth the reasons why the proposed amendment is necessary and how such amendment is in conformity with the policies of this division. The local government shall be provided an opportunity to set forth the reasons for its action. The commission may, after public hearing, approve and certify the proposed amendment if it finds, after a careful balancing of social, economic, and environmental effects, that to do otherwise would adversely affect the public welfare, that a public need of an area greater than that included within the certified local coastal program would be met, that there is no feasible, less environmentally damaging alternative way to meet such need, and that the proposed amendment is in conformity with the policies of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30516.

(a) Approval of a local coastal program shall not be withheld because of the inability of the local government to financially support or implement any policy or policies contained in this division; provided, however, that this shall not require the approval of a local coastal program allowing development not in conformity with the policies in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200). 

(b) Where a certified port master plan has been incorporated in a local coastal program in accordance with Section 30711 and the local coastal program is disapproved by the commission, that disapproval shall not apply to the certified port master plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

30517.

The commission may extend, for a period of not to exceed one year, any time limitation established by this chapter for good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 6.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30517.5.

(a) Within 60 days from the effective date of this section, the commission shall establish a schedule for the submittal of all land use plans that have not been submitted, pursuant to Section 30501, to a former regional commission or the commission on or before July 1, 1981. This schedule shall be based on the commission’s assessment, in consultation with local governments, of each local government’s current status and progress. The schedule shall specify that submittals may not be made sooner than nor later than certain specified dates and in no event later than January 1, 1983.

(b) If a local government fails to meet the schedule established pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission may take any of the following actions:

(1) Waive the deadlines for commission action on a submitted land use plan, or any portion thereof, as set forth in Sections 30511 and 30512.

(2) Prepare and adopt, after a public hearing but not sooner than January 1, 1984, a land use plan for the land area within the local government’s jurisdiction. After adoption of the land use plan, the commission shall determine the permissibility of proposed developments pursuant to the provisions of the adopted plan. The affected local government may choose to adopt, in whole or in part, the commission’s prepared and adopted land use plan in which event the commission shall certify the plan, in whole or in part, or it may continue to prepare its own land use plan consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(3) Report the matter to the Legislature with recommendations for appropriate action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

30517.6.

(a) Within 30 days after the certification of a land use plan, or any portion thereof, the commission shall, after consultation with the appropriate local government, establish a date for that local government to submit the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and, where necessary, other implementing actions. In no event shall that date be later than January 1, 1984.

(b) If a local government fails to meet the schedule established pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission may waive the deadlines for commission action on submitted zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and, where necessary, other implementing actions, as set forth in Sections 30511 and 30513.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

30519.

(a) Except for appeals to the commission, as provided in Section 30603, after a local coastal program, or any portion thereof, has been certified and all implementing actions within the area affected have become effective, the development review authority provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall no longer be exercised by the commission over any new development proposed within the area to which the certified local coastal program, or any portion thereof, applies and shall at that time be delegated to the local government that is implementing the local coastal program or any portion thereof. 

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any development proposed or undertaken on any tidelands, submerged lands, or on public trust lands, whether filled or unfilled, lying within the coastal zone, nor shall it apply to any development proposed or undertaken within ports covered by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 30700) or within any state university or college within the coastal zone; however, this section shall apply to any development proposed or undertaken by a port or harbor district or authority on lands or waters granted by the Legislature to a local government whose certified local coastal program includes the specific development plans for such district or authority. 

(c) The commission may, from time to time, recommend to the appropriate local government local coastal program amendments to accommodate uses of greater than local importance, which uses are not permitted by the applicable certified local coastal program. These uses may be listed generally or the commission may recommend specific uses of greater than local importance for consideration by the appropriate local government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

30519.1.

(a) This section shall apply only to those parcels and areas within the City of Carlsbad for which a local coastal program has been prepared and certified by the commission pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 30170 or Section 30171.

(b) Any provisions of any such local coastal program with respect to housing for persons and families of low or moderate income shall have no force or effect after January 1, 1982. After that date, housing requirements for those parcels and areas shall be determined pursuant to Section 65590 of the Government Code. 

(c) Until such time as, (i) the City of Carlsbad adopts or enacts the implementing actions contained in any such local coastal program, or (ii) other statutory provisions provide alternately for the adoption, certification, and implementation of a local coastal program for those parcels and areas, coastal development permits for those parcels and areas shall be issued by the commission as provided in this subdivision. Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the commission shall issue a coastal development permit if it finds that a proposed development is in conformity with the certified local coastal program, exclusive of any provisions with respect to housing for persons and families of low or moderate income which have been rendered inoperative pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 14.5.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30519.2.

(a) (1) This subdivision shall only apply to territory described in paragraph (2) and defined as the “Annexed Area.”

(2) For purposes of this section, “Annexed Area” means the territory consisting of approximately 5,450 acres in the County of Orange bounded to the north by the inland boundary of the coastal zone, to the east by the western boundary of Crystal Cove State Park, to the south by the state’s outer limit of jurisdiction over the Pacific Ocean, and to the west by the city limits of the City of Newport Beach.

(3) This subdivision shall be operative upon the effective date of the annexation of all or part of the Annexed Area by the City of Newport Beach.

(4) Upon the recordation of a certificate of completion of any reorganization or change of organization that results in the annexation of all or part of the Annexed Area by the City of Newport Beach, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The local coastal program applicable to any part of the Annexed Area shall continue to be the certified local coastal program for the County of Orange.

(B) The County of Orange shall continue to exercise all development review authority described in Section 30519, as delegated to it by the commission consistent with the certified local coastal program of the County of Orange for the Annexed Area.

(5) If, at any time after the recordation of the certificate of completion of the annexation of the Annexed Area, the City of Newport Beach elects to assume coastal management responsibility for the Annexed Area, the city may begin preparation of a local coastal program for that area. The City of Newport Beach may adopt provisions of the County of Orange’s certified local coastal program that apply to the Annexed Area. All of the procedures for the preparation, approval, and certification of a local coastal program set forth in this division, and any applicable regulations adopted by the commission, shall apply to the preparation, approval, and certification of a local coastal program for the Annexed Area.

(6) If the City of Newport Beach obtains certification of a local coastal program for the Annexed Area, the city shall, upon the effective date of that certification, exercise all of the authority granted to a local government with a certified local coastal program, and the provisions of paragraph (4) shall become inoperative.

(b) On or before June 30, 2003, or 24 months after the annexation of the Annexed Area, whichever event occurs first, the City of Newport Beach shall submit to the commission for approval and certification the city’s local coastal program for all of the geographic area within the coastal zone and the city’s corporate boundaries as of June 30, 2000. The submittal may include a local coastal program segment for the Annexed Area that will implement the local coastal program for the County of Orange as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(c) If the City of Newport Beach fails to submit a local coastal program to the commission for approval and certification pursuant to subdivision (b) or does not have an effectively certified local coastal program within six months after the commission’s approval of the local coastal program, the City of Newport Beach shall submit a monthly late fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to be deposited into the Violation Remediation Account of the Coastal Conservancy Fund, to be expended in accordance with the purposes of Section 30823. The City of Newport Beach shall pay the monthly late fee until the time that the city commences implementation of an effectively certified local coastal program. The city may not recover the cost of the late fee from any owner or lessee of property in the coastal zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   Effective October 5, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30519.5.

(a) The commission shall, from time to time, but at least once every five years after certification, review every certified local coastal program to determine whether such program is being effectively implemented in conformity with the policies of this division. If the commission determines that a certified local coastal program is not being carried out in conformity with any policy of this division it shall submit to the affected local government recommendations of corrective actions that should be taken. Such recommendations may include recommended amendments to the affected local government’s local coastal program. 

(b) Recommendations submitted pursuant to this section shall be reviewed by the affected local government and, if the recommended action is not taken, the local government shall, within one year of such submission, forward to the commission a report setting forth its reasons for not taking the recommended action. The commission shall review such report and, where appropriate, report to the Legislature and recommend legislative action necessary to assure effective implementation of the relevant policy or policies of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30520.

(a) If the application of any certified local coastal program, or any portion thereof, is prohibited or stayed by any court, the permit authority provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall be exercised pursuant to the provisions of this section until a final court order has withdrawn such prohibition or stay. A coastal development permit shall be issued by the affected local government or the commission on appeal, if that local government or the commission on appeal finds that the proposed development is in conformity with the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) or the applicable certified land use plan if the court-ordered prohibition or stay applies only to the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, or, where necessary, the other implementing actions which are required pursuant to this chapter. Any development approved by a local government pursuant to this subdivision may be appealed to the commission by any person, including the executive director or any commissioner during the period the permit provisions of this section are in effect.

(b) Until a local government has adopted an interim ordinance prescribing procedures for issuing coastal development permits in the circumstances described in subdivision (a), the permit authority provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall be reinstated in the commission. A coastal development permit shall be issued by the commission if the commission finds that the proposed development is in conformity with the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) or the applicable certified land use plan, if the court-ordered prohibition or stay applies only to zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, or, where necessary, the other implementing actions which are required pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The permit authority provided for in this section shall be limited to only those developments which would be affected by the court-ordered prohibition or stay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 15.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30522.

Nothing in this chapter shall permit the commission to certify a local coastal program which provides for a lesser degree of environmental protection than that provided by the plans and policies of any state regulatory agency that are formally adopted by such agency, are used in the regulatory program of such agency, and are legally enforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------

30523.

It is the intent of the Legislature that local coastal programs certified by the commission should be sufficiently specific to meet the requirements of Section 30108.5, but not so detailed as to require amendment and commission review for minor changes, or to discourage the assumption by local governments of postcertification authority which ensures and implements effective protection of coastal resources. The Legislature also recognizes that the applicable policies and the level of specificity required to ensure coastal resource protection may differ between areas on or near the shoreline and inland areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 899.)
-------------------------------------------

30525.

(a) Every state agency that owns or manages land or water areas within the coastal zone, including public beaches, parks, natural areas, and fish and wildlife preserves, shall identify the sensitive resource values within those areas that are particularly susceptible to adverse impacts from nearby development that is not carefully planned. Every such agency shall also identify the location and type of development that would have a significant adverse impact on those sensitive resource values. 

(b) Every agency subject to this section shall advise the appropriate local government of particular considerations that should be evaluated during the preparation of a local coastal program and which, in the opinion of such agency, may be necessary to protect identified sensitive resource values. In addition, the work undertaken pursuant to this section shall be completed in a timely manner in order to maximize the opportunity for the public, affected local governments, and the commission to consider this information fully during the preparation, review, and approval of the appropriate local coastal program.

(c) Work already completed pursuant to former Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 31300) of Division 21 of the Public Resources Code, added by Chapter 1441 of the Statutes of 1976, and in conformity with this section, that identifies sensitive resource values within publicly owned or managed land and water areas of the coastal zone shall be considered by local government and the commission in the course of carrying out this chapter. 

(d) For purposes of this section, “sensitive resource values” means those fragile or unique natural resources which are particularly susceptible to degradation resulting from surrounding development, the adverse effects of which have not been carefully evaluated, mitigated, or avoided. Examples include, but are not limited to, environmentally sensitive areas, as defined in Section 30107.5, areas uniquely suited for scientific or educational purposes, and specific public recreation areas where the quality of the recreational experience is dependent on the character of the surrounding area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

30526.

(a) Because of the intensity of development contemplated, the area’s steep topography and highly erodible soils, and the demonstrated impacts from development despite the utilization of mitigation measures, the Legislature finds that the threat from development to wetlands in the City of San Diego requires that a mitigation fee program be included in the city’s local coastal program. Therefore, the City of San Diego shall provide in its local coastal program for payment of a reasonable fee to the State Coastal Conservancy by applicants for a coastal development permit if the proposed development has, or is reasonably expected to have, a direct and significant effect on coastal resources within a specific geographic watershed in the coastal zone which can be mitigated through the incorporation of feasible onsite and offsite mitigation measures into the proposed development and through the mitigation fee program.

(b) Fees paid by an applicant pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in an account established by the State Coastal Conservancy . None of the funds in the account shall be appropriated for any purpose not specified in this section. Except as provided in this section, any fee paid pursuant to this section may only be used to restore, replace, or improve resources or ecological systems which are adversely affected by the proposed development and with respect to which the fee constitutes partial or total mitigation. Any fees established pursuant to this section are not required for any development that is undertaken by a public agency for the purpose of providing resource enhancement or public recreation. In the event that mitigation of all development impacts cannot be feasibly carried out within the watershed, the conservancy may, with the approval of the local government and the commission, complete the mitigation for the development outside of the watershed.

(c) This section and Section 31108.5 apply only to the Los Penasquitos Lagoon area in the City of San Diego.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Coastal Public Access Program [30530. - 30534.]

30530.

It is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 31400) of Division 21, that a program to maximize public access to and along the coastline be prepared and implemented in a manner that ensures coordination among and the most efficient use of limited fiscal resources by federal, state, and local agencies responsible for acquisition, development, and maintenance of public coastal accessways. There is a need to coordinate public access programs so as to minimize costly duplication and conflicts and to assure that, to the extent practicable, different access programs complement one another and are incorporated within an integrated system of public accessways to and along the state’s coastline. The Legislature recognizes that different public agencies are currently implementing public access programs and encourages such agencies to strengthen those programs in order to provide yet greater public benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 840.)
-------------------------------------------

30531.

The commission shall be responsible for the preparation of a public coastal access program which includes the elements set forth in this section and which, to the maximum extent practicable, is incorporated into the local coastal programs prepared, approved, and implemented pursuant to this division.

(a) On or before January 1, 1981, the commission shall prepare a coastal access inventory. The coastal access inventory shall be updated on a continuing basis and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) A list identifying lands held or operated for the purpose of providing public access to or along the coast. Each listing shall include a brief description of the type of access provided, access constraints, access facility ownership, and resources or uses for which access is provided or suitable.

(2) A list of known offers to dedicate, accepted dedications, and any other legally binding actions taken that provide opportunities for any type of public use of or access to or along the coast. Each listing shall include a brief description of the legal status of the instrument granting or otherwise providing public access, whether public access is physically available, and if not, what action is necessary to be taken to accomplish actual public use.

(3) A map showing the precise location of the listings included pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision.

(b) On or before June 1, 1980, the commission shall, in consultation with the Department of Parks and Recreation, the State Coastal Conservancy, and other appropriate public agencies, make recommendations to guide state, local, and to the extent permitted by law federal public agencies in the identification, development, and management of public accessways to and along the coast. The recommendations made pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the public access policies of this division and, with respect to recommendations relating to development of public accessways, consistent with the policy of protecting coastal resources.

(c) On or before January 1, 1981, and from time to time thereafter, the commission, in consultation with the State Coastal Conservancy and other affected public agencies, shall identify the public agency or agencies it deems the most appropriate agency or agencies to accept responsibility for the management of those public coastal accessways listed pursuant to subdivision (a) for which no public agency has accepted such management responsibilities. In identifying the agency or agencies most appropriate to accept public access management responsibilities, the commission shall include its best estimate of costs for the development, operation, and maintenance of such accessways and shall recommend to the Governor and the Legislature a method of funding such costs. In preparing its recommendations for funding public coastal accessway operation and maintenance costs, the commission shall develop alternative, innovative funding techniques that take into account the appropriateness of local funding for the operation and maintenance of accessways that serve primarily local needs. If the commission identifies a state agency as the appropriate agency to assume management responsibility and such agency does not accept such responsibility, the agency shall, by December 31 of the year in which the commission completes its report, advise the commission of its reasons why it did not or cannot accept such responsibility. The State Coastal Conservancy shall take those actions it deems appropriate, including necessary agreements, to negotiate or otherwise accomplish the acceptance of management responsibility by the agency identified by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 840.)
-------------------------------------------

30532.

The commission may enter into agreements with or issue grants to any public agency for the purpose of assisting the commission in meeting the requirements of this article. The commission shall, to the extent available funding permits, enter into agreements with those state agencies that currently operate some form of public coastal access program for the purpose of completing the inventory required by subdivision (a) of Section 30531. The commission shall enter into an agreement with the State Coastal Conservancy to provide the funding necessary for the conservancy to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to this article and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 31400) of Division 21.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 840.)
-------------------------------------------

30534.

The commission shall, within 10 days after receiving evidence of recordation of any offer to dedicate real property for access to or along the coast, which dedication was required as a condition to the issuance of a coastal development permit, forward a copy of such evidence and a description of such real property to the Department of Parks and Recreation, the State Coastal Conservancy, and the State Lands Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 840.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Development Controls [30600. - 30627.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [30600. - 30617.]

30600.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), and in addition to obtaining any other permit required by law from any local government or from any state, regional, or local agency, any person, as defined in Section 21066, wishing to perform or undertake any development in the coastal zone, other than a facility subject to Section 25500, shall obtain a coastal development permit.

(b) (1) Prior to certification of its local coastal program, a local government may, with respect to any development within its area of jurisdiction in the coastal zone and consistent with the provisions of Sections 30604, 30620, and 30620.5, establish procedures for the filing, processing, review, modification, approval, or denial of a coastal development permit. Those procedures may be incorporated and made a part of the procedures relating to any other appropriate land use development permit issued by the local government. 

(2) A coastal development permit from a local government shall not be required by this subdivision for any development on tidelands, submerged lands, or on public trust lands, whether filled or unfilled, or for any development by a public agency for which a local government permit is not otherwise required.

(c) If prior to certification of its local coastal program, a local government does not exercise the option provided in subdivision (b), or a development is not subject to the requirements of subdivision (b), a coastal development permit shall be obtained from the commission or from a local government as provided in subdivision (d).

(d) After certification of its local coastal program or pursuant to the provisions of Section 30600.5, a coastal development permit shall be obtained from the local government as provided for in Section 30519 or Section 30600.5.

(e) This section does not apply to any of the following projects, except that notification by the agency or public utility performing any of the following projects shall be made to the commission within 14 days from the date of the commencement of the project:

(1) Immediate emergency work necessary to protect life or property or immediate emergency repairs to public service facilities necessary to maintain service as a result of a disaster in a disaster-stricken area in which a state of emergency has been proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Emergency projects undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to maintain, repair, or restore an existing highway, as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code, except for a highway designated as an official state scenic highway pursuant to Section 262 of the Streets and Highways Code, within the existing right-of-way of the highway, damaged as a result of fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide, within one year of the damage. This paragraph does not exempt from this section any project undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to expand or widen a highway damaged by fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 825, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30600.1.

(a) In the event that an applicant for a coastal development permit had, prior to January 1, 1982, received from the appropriate local government final discretionary approval to proceed with a proposed development, but had not been issued a coastal development permit prior to that date, the provisions of subdivision (b) or (c) shall apply to any requirements for housing for persons or families of low or moderate income which may be applicable to the proposed development.

(b) In the event that the commission has approved an application for a coastal development permit, but the applicant has not complied with conditions in regard to such housing which were imposed by the commission as part of its approval, the applicant shall do either of the following:

(1) Comply with the housing and other applicable conditions imposed by the commission, in which event the coastal development permit shall be issued and the provisions of Section 65590 of the Government Code shall not apply to the development.

(2) Apply to the appropriate local government as provided in Section 65590.1 of the Government Code to have that local government apply the requirements of Section 65590 of the Government Code to the proposed development, in which event, no condition previously imposed by the commission with respect to such housing shall be applicable to the proposed development.

(c) In the event that application has not been acted upon prior to January 1, 1982, the commission shall process the application as otherwise required by this division, but shall not impose any condition or requirement with respect to housing for persons or families of low or moderate income on the proposed development. The applicant shall apply to the appropriate local government as provided in Section 65590.1 of the Government Code to have that local government apply the requirements of Section 65590 of the Government Code to the proposed development. The commission, at its discretion, may defer action on this application until the local government has acted to apply the requirements of Section 65590 of the Government Code. The time limits otherwise applicable to commission action on this application shall be stayed during any such period of deferral. If however any such application is for a conversion of a residential dwelling as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 65590 of the Government Code, the commission shall not defer processing of such application but shall defer the final issuance of a coastal development permit until the local government has applied the requirements of Section 65590 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 15.5.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30600.5.

(a) Before the certification of a local coastal program and notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 30519, after the effective date of this section, the authority for issuance of coastal development permits provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall be delegated to local governments pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(b) Except for any development specified in subdivision (b) of Section 30519 and Section 30601 or with respect to any development proposed by any state agency, the authority for issuance of coastal
 development permits provided for in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600) shall be delegated to the respective local governments within 120 days after (1) the effective date of certification of a land use plan pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500) or (2) the effective date of this section, whichever occurs last. This delegation shall only apply with respect to those areas governed by the certified land use plan or a certified portion of the land use plan, applicable to an identifiable geographic area.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, after delegation of authority to issue coastal development permits pursuant to subdivision (b), a coastal development permit shall be issued by the respective local
 government or the commission on appeal, if that local government or the commission on appeal finds that the proposed development is in conformity with the certified land use plan.

(d) Any action taken by a local government on a coastal development permit application pursuant to the provisions of this section may be appealed to the commission pursuant to Section 30602. The commission shall hear an appeal brought pursuant to the provisions of this section, unless it determines that the local government action taken raises no substantial issue as to conformity with the certified land use plan. For purposes of this subdivision, failure by any local government to act within any time limit specified in this division shall constitute an “action taken.”

(e) The commission shall, following a public hearing and within 90 days after the effective date of this section, adopt minimum standards
 for public notice, hearing, and appeal procedures to govern local government review of coastal development permit applications pursuant to this section. The standards shall, as nearly as practical, follow the standards required for local agencies after certification of local coastal programs for appealable developments and shall ensure that the notice and hearing required for the coastal development permit can be provided at the same time as the notice and hearing requirements for other local land use decisions that may be necessary for the project requiring the permit. Within 60 days before assumption of authority for issuance of coastal development permits pursuant to this section, the local government shall provide drafts of all procedures for issuance of coastal development permits to the executive director of the commission. Delegation of the authority to issue coastal development permits pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not occur until the local government has provided copies of all the adopted
 procedures for the issuance of coastal development permits to the executive director of the commission. Any amendments to the procedures shall also be furnished to the executive director for their information.

(f) Before the delegation of authority to issue coastal development permits as provided in subdivision (b), a local government, after appropriate notice and hearing, shall adopt an ordinance prescribing the procedures to be used in issuing coastal development permits. Each ordinance shall incorporate at least the minimum standards for public notice, hearings, and appeals established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (e). In addition, each ordinance shall contain provisions that prohibit the issuance of a coastal development permit
 for any development that may conflict with the ordinances that are being prepared to implement the certified land use plan.

(g) In order to expedite certification of complete local coastal programs and the transfer of coastal development controls to local government, the commission shall, on request from a local government, prepare the ordinances necessary for that local government to implement the coastal permit responsibilities of this division.

(h) The time limits set forth in subdivision (b) shall be extended, by right, for not more than 90 days if a local government, by resolution of its governing body, so requests.

(i) The provisions of this section and of any local ordinance enacted pursuant thereto shall have no further force or effect or application after that local government’s local coastal program has
 been certified and taken effect pursuant to the provisions of this division.

(j) This section shall become inoperative and shall have no force or effect on the date, if any, of a final judicial decision that its provisions are inconsistent with the requirements of the
 Federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. 1451 et seq.), as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 7.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (j).)
-------------------------------------------

30600.6.

(a) The Legislature finds that some new cost may be incurred by local governments when the authority to issue coastal development permits is delegated to these local governments as provided in Section 30600.5. It is the intent of the Legislature that during the period prior to certification of a local government’s local coastal program these new costs shall be funded as provided in this section.

(b) If a local government has been delegated authority to issue coastal development permits as provided in Section 30600.5, any new costs incurred by reason thereof shall be recovered from fees charged to individual permit applicants. Such fees shall cover only those costs which meet all of the following criteria: 

(1) The costs are attributable to the actual issuance of coastal development permits, including a pro rata share of general administrative costs.

(2) The costs would not have been incurred except for the delegation of authority to issue coastal development permits as provided in Section 30600.5.

(3) The costs are of a type which would not normally be incurred by the local government in carrying out its land use planning and regulatory responsibilities pursuant to other provisions of law.

(c) A local government may elect not to levy fees as provided in this section. If the local government does not levy such fees, it shall not be eligible to be reimbursed for such costs pursuant to other provisions of law.
